Virginia statutes. Title 23. Educational Institutions.
§§ 23-1 through 23-307.

Repealed by Acts 2016, c. 588, cl. 10, effective October 1, 2016.

Editor’s note.

For complete transition provisions regarding the recodification of Title 23 as new Title 23.1, and the effect of 2016 amendments to Title 23,
see §

23.1-100

. Where appropriate, the historical citations to former sections have been added to corresponding new sections.
For tables of corresponding former and new sections, see the tables in Volume 10.